Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201277-2604.01
Cigarette sales; reports required;
form; contents; sharing of information.

(1) Any person that sells cigarettes from
this state into another state shall, within fifteen days following the end
of each month, file a report on a form and in the manner prescribed by the
Tax Commissioner and certify to the state that the report is complete and
accurate.

(2) The report
shall contain the following information:

(a) The total number of cigarettes sold
from this state into another state by the person during that month, identifying
by name and number of cigarettes (i) the manufacturers of those cigarettes,
(ii) the brand families of those cigarettes, and (iii) the name and address
of each recipient of those cigarettes;

(b) The number of stamps of each other
state the person affixed to the packages containing those cigarettes during
that month, the total number of cigarettes contained in the packages to which
it affixed each respective other state's stamp and by name and number of cigarettes,
and the manufacturers and brand families of the packages to which it affixed
each respective other state's stamp; and

(c) If the person sold cigarettes during
that month from this state into another state in packages not bearing a stamp
of the other state, (i) the total number of cigarettes contained in such packages,
identifying by name and number of cigarettes, the manufacturers of those cigarettes,
the brand families of those cigarettes, and the name and address of each recipient
of those cigarettes, and (ii) the person's basis for belief that such state
permits the sale of the cigarettes to consumers in a package not bearing a
stamp, and the amount of excise, use, or similar tax imposed on the cigarettes
paid by the person to such state on the cigarettes. Manufacturers and importers
need include the information described in subdivision (2)(c)(i) of this section
only as to cigarettes not sold to a person authorized by the law of the other
state to affix the stamp required by the other state.

(3) In the case of a manufacturer
or importer, the report shall include cigarettes sold from this state into
another state through its sales entity affiliate. A sales entity affiliate
shall file a separate report under this section only to the extent that it
sold cigarettes from this state into another state not separately reported
under this section by its affiliated manufacturer or importer.

(4) The Tax Commissioner
may share the information reported under this section with the taxing or law
enforcement authorities of this state or other states.

Laws 2011, LB590, § 27.